Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7509
Premium adjustments.

(1) For medical professional liability insurance and for insurance subject to section 44-7508, insurers may increase or decrease premiums on an individual risk basis up to forty percent based on any factor except:

(a) The rate adjustment cannot be based upon the race, creed, national origin, or religion of the insured;

(b) The rate adjustment cannot violate the Unfair Discrimination Against Subjects of Abuse in Insurance Act;

(c) The rate adjustment cannot apply to (i) insurance covering risks of a personal nature, including insurance for homeowners, tenants, private passenger nonfleet automobiles, mobile homes, and other property and casualty insurance for personal, family, or household needs or (ii) insurance covering farms and ranches, including crop insurance; and

(d) The rate adjustment cannot be based solely upon the fact that the insured is deployed in the military on Title 10 orders that require the insured to be mobilized outside of the United States, United States territories, and the District of Columbia for a period of six months or greater.

(2) If the director finds after a hearing that (a) the utilization of this section by the insurance industry has produced a significant number of rate modifications at or near the upper limit and at the lower limit of the allowable range of modification and (b) the modifiers at and near the upper and lower limits of the allowable range of modification appear to be predominantly correlated with individual risk factors that relate to expected losses and expenses, the director may, by rules and regulations, broaden the range of plus or minus forty percent for any line or type of insurance subject to section 44-7508.

(3) If the director finds after a hearing that modifiers at or near the upper or lower limits of the allowable range of modification are not predominantly correlated with individual risk factors that relate to expected losses and expenses, the director may, by rules and regulations, reduce the range of plus or minus forty percent for any line or type of insurance subject to section 44-7508, but such reduction shall not be to less than plus or minus twenty-five percent.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 9;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 50;

Laws 2005, LB 119, § 28;

Laws 2021, LB77, § 2.
August 28, 2021
Unfair Discrimination Against Subjects of Abuse in Insurance Act, see section 44-7401.